Maine, session 132, LD2123.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3174-S, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Reimbursement for anesthesia for dental services. The department shall
provide supplemental payments to providers when reimbursing for medically necessary
deep sedation or general anesthesia for dental services when those dental services are
provided at an ambulatory surgical center and the patient population receiving dental
services at that ambulatory surgical center consists of at least 50% MaineCare members on
an annual basis. The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Department of Health and Human Services to modify MaineCare
Benefits Manual; no time limit on medically necessary anesthesia for
children's dental services. The Department of Health and Human Services shall amend
its rules in Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section 25, Dental
Services and Reimbursement Methodology, to require that, when an ambulatory surgical
center provides comprehensive dental services under deep sedation or general anesthesia
to a patient population that is made up of at least 50% MaineCare members, no limitation
may be placed on the length of time that reimbursable anesthesia services are provided to
a MaineCare member who is a child for a single procedure as long as those anesthesia
services are considered medically necessary. During the first year of operation of an
ambulatory surgical center, the MaineCare member population must be measured on a
monthly basis and for every year thereafter, the MaineCare member population must be
measured on an annual basis.
Sec. 3. Department of Health and Human Services to modify MaineCare
Benefits Manual and fee schedule; reimbursement rates for medically
necessary anesthesia provided for children's dental services. The Department of
Health and Human Services shall amend its rules in Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits
Manual, Chapter II, Section 25, Dental Services and Reimbursement Methodology, and the
department's fee schedule for dental services, to require that, when an ambulatory surgical
Page 1 - 132LR2747(01)

413 center provides comprehensive dental services under deep sedation or general anesthesia
424 to a patient population that is made up of at least 50% MaineCare members:
1. The reimbursement rate for anesthesia services provided to a child must be at least
$250 for every 15-minute increment of anesthesia services provided;
2. Anesthesia services provided to a child must be billed using current dental
terminology codes D9222 and D9223; and
3. Increases in the reimbursement rate established pursuant to subsection 1 must be
made in future rate determination processes.
During the first year of operation of an ambulatory surgical center, the MaineCare
member population must be measured on a monthly basis and for every year thereafter, the
MaineCare member population must be measured on an annual basis.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.